Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 884 (3) 91 jda/jh/md H.F. 884 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. Employ chaplains, or engage chaplains to 3 serve without compensation or remuneration, in the same manner 4 as a school district under section 279.87. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. A charter school or innovation zone 8 school may employ chaplains, or engage chaplains to serve 9 without compensation or remuneration, in the same manner as a 10 school district under section 279.87. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 School chaplains. 12 1. The board of directors of a school district may employ a 13 chaplain, or engage a chaplain to serve without compensation or 14 remuneration, to provide support, services, and programs for 15 students as assigned by the board of directors of the school 16 district. 17 2. a. Subject to paragraph âbâ , the board of directors of 18 a school district may establish qualifications, credentialing, 19 and other requirements related to chaplains who are employed or 20 engaged pursuant to this section. 21 b. The board of directors of a school district shall not 22 require a chaplain employed or engaged under this section to 23 have a license, endorsement, certification, authorization, or 24 statement of recognition issued by the board of educational 25 examiners. 26 3. The procedure for background investigations and 27 termination established in section 279.69 shall apply to 28 chaplains employed or engaged under this section. 29 4. The board of directors of a school district shall not do 30 any of the following: 31 a. Require or coerce a student to utilize the support, 32 services, or programs provided by a chaplain who is employed 33 or engaged by the board of directors of the school district 34 pursuant to this section. 35 -1- HF 884 (3) 91 jda/jh/md 1/ 2 H.F. 884 b. Employ or engage a chaplain in lieu of a school counselor 1 or a qualified guidance counselor licensed by the board of 2 educational examiners under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3 3. 4 -2- HF 884 (3) 91 jda/jh/md 2/ 2